csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_Cnj_n.yaml
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: miinaasiwaawegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: miinaawegwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: miinaasiwaawaden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: miinaawaden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: miinigosiigwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: miinigogwen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: miinaasiwaawangiden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: miinaawangiden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: miinaasiwaawangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: miinaawangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+3SgProx: miinaasiwaawinden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+3SgProx: miinaawinden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: miinigosig
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: miinigod
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: miinaasiwag
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: miinag
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: miinaasiweg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: miineg
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: miinaasiwad
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: miinad
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: miinigosig
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: miinigod
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: miinaasiwangid
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: miinangid
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: miinaasiwang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: miinang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+3SgProx: miinaasiwind
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+3SgProx: miinind
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: miinigosigoban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+3SgProx: miinigopan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: miinaasiwagiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: miinagiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: miinaasiwegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: miinegiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: miinaasiwadiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: miinadiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: miinigosigoban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgProx: miinigopan
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: miinangidiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: miinangidiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: miinaasiwangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: miinangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+3SgProx: miinaasiwindiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+3SgProx: miinindiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: miinigosiiwaangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: miinigowaangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+Excl: miizhisiiwaangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+Excl: miizhiwaangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+Excl: miizhisiiwaangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+Excl: miizhiwaangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: miizhisiiwangidwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: miizhiwangidwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: miizhisiiwangiden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: miizhiwangiden
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+Excl: miinigoosiiwaangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+Excl: miinigoowaangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: miinigosiwaang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: miinigoyaang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+Excl: miizhisiwaang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+Excl: miizhiyaang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+Excl: miizhisiwaang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+Excl: miizhiyaang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: miizhisiwangidwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: miizhiyangidwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: miizhisiwangid
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: miizhiyangid
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+Excl: miinigoosiwaang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+Excl: miinigooyaang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: miinigosiwaangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Excl: miinigoyaangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+Excl: miizhisiwaangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+Excl: miizhiyaangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+Excl: miizhisiwaangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+Excl: miizhiyaangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: miizhisiwangidwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: miizhiyangidwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: miizhisiwangidiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: miizhiyangidiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+Excl: miinigoosiwaangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+Excl: miinigooyaangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: miinigosiiwangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: miinigowangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: miinisiinowangwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Incl: miininowangwaawen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: miinisiinowangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Incl: miininowangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+Incl: miinigoosiiwangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+Incl: miinigoowangen
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: miinigosiwang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: miinigoyang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: miinisinowangwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Incl: miininangwaa
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: miinisinowang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Incl: miininang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+Incl: miinigoosiwang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+Incl: miinigooyang
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: miinigosiwangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0Sg/0Pl+Incl: miinigoyangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: miinisinowangwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Incl: miininangwaaban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: miinisinowangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Incl: miininangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+Incl: miinigoosiwangiban
     miizh+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+Incl: miinigooyangiban
